Maryland, session 2026, HB0854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–331.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE NONPUBLIC SPECIAL
EDUCATION SCHOOL RENOVATION PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A NONPUBLIC SPECIAL EDUCATION SCHOOL
RENOVATION PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO
NONPUBLIC SPECIAL EDUCATION SCHOOLS FOR:
(I) RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS TO CLASSROOMS AND
SCHOOL FACILITIES;
(II) UPGRADES TO RESIDENTIAL COTTAGES ON SCHOOL
GROUNDS THAT WILL IMPROVE STUDENT TREATMENT AND SAFETY;
(III) HEALTH, SAFETY, AND ACCESSIBILITY IMPROVEMENTS;
– 1 –

Ch. 768 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) INFRASTRUCTURE MODERNIZATION AND TECHNOLOGY
UPGRADES; AND
(V) NEW CONSTRUCTION NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH
STANDARDS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE IMPLEMENTED AND ADMINISTERED BY THE
INTERAGENCY COMMISSION.
(D) (1) AN ELIGIBLE NONPUBLIC SPECIAL EDUCATION SCHOOL MAY
APPLY TO THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION TO RECEIVE A GRANT UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(2) A NONPUBLIC SPECIAL EDUCATION SCHOOL IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE
PROGRAM IF THE SCHOOL:
(I) OPERATES IN CONJUNCTION WITH A RESIDENTIAL
TREATMENT CENTER THAT IS LICENSED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE DEPARTMENT OF
JUVENILE SERVICES;
(II) (I) PROVIDES:
1. HIGH SCHOOL CREDIT TOWARDS THE HIGH SCHOOL
GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
2. A CURRICULUM AND EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM FOR
ELEMENTARY OR MIDDLE SCHOOL STUDENTS THAT IS APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(III) (II) PROVIDES SERVICES FOR STUDENTS PLACED IN
NONPUBLIC EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS UNDER § 8–406 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION MAY PRIORITIZE APPLICATIONS FOR:
(1) PROJECTS ADDRESSING STUDENT HEALTH OR SAFETY
CONCERNS;
(2) PROJECTS NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH STANDARDS SET BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 768
(3) NONPUBLIC SPECIAL EDUCATION SCHOOLS WITH A HIGH
PERCENTAGE OF STUDENTS WHO ARE RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
(F) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR MAY IT IS THE INTENT OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE GOVERNOR INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL CAPITAL
BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $5,000,000 TO THE PROGRAM FOR
EACH FISCAL YEAR.
(G) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –